Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8214
Voluntary dissolution; approval of director required; effect of dissolution.

The director shall approve any voluntary dissolution of a captive insurer if the director determines that all obligations of the captive insurer have been satisfied. The dissolution of a captive insurer shall not impair the right of any person to commence an action against the captive insurer for any liability previously incurred.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 48.